California statutes. Civil Code
are acceptable to you.(2) In responding to the request, the expert shall determine whether the property is within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as defined in Section 66620 of the Government Code. If the property is within the commission’s jurisdiction, the report shall contain the following notice:
 NOTICE OF SAN FRANCISCO BAY CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION JURISDICTION

This property is located within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission. Use and development of property within the commission’s jurisdiction may be subject to special regulations, restrictions, and permit requirements. You may wish to investigate and determine whether they are acceptable to you and
 your intended use of the property before you complete your transaction.

(3) In responding to the request, the expert shall determine whether the property is presently located within one mile of a parcel of real property designated as “Prime Farmland,” “Farmland of Statewide Importance,” “Unique Farmland,” “Farmland of Local Importance,” or “Grazing Land” on the most current “Important Farmland Map” issued by the California Department of Conservation, Division of Land Resource Protection, utilizing solely the county-level GIS map data, if any, available on the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program Web site. If the residential property is within one mile of a designated farmland area, the report shall contain the following notice:

NOTICE OF RIGHT TO FARM

This property is located within one mile of a farm or ranch land designated on the
 current county-level GIS “Important Farmland Map,” issued by the California Department of Conservation, Division of Land Resource Protection. Accordingly, the property may be subject to inconveniences or discomforts resulting from agricultural operations that are a normal and necessary aspect of living in a community with a strong rural character and a healthy agricultural sector. Customary agricultural practices in farm operations may include, but are not limited to, noise, odors, dust, light, insects, the operation of pumps and machinery, the storage and disposal of manure, bee pollination, and the ground or aerial application of fertilizers, pesticides, and herbicides. These agricultural practices may occur at any time during the 24-hour day. Individual sensitivities to those practices can vary from person to person. You may wish to consider the impacts of such agricultural practices before you complete your purchase. Please be advised that you may be barred from obtaining legal remedies against
 agricultural practices conducted in a manner consistent with proper and accepted customs and standards pursuant to Section 3482.5 of the Civil Code or any pertinent local ordinance.

(4) In responding to the request, the expert shall determine, utilizing map coordinate data made available by the Office of Mine Reclamation, whether the property is presently located within one mile of a mine operation for which map coordinate data has been reported to the director pursuant to Section 2207 of the Public Resources Code. If the expert determines, from the available map coordinate data, that the residential property is located within one mile of a mine operation, the report shall contain the following notice:

 

NOTICE OF MINING OPERATIONS:

This property is located within one mile of a mine
 operation for which the mine owner or operator has reported mine location data to the Department of Conservation pursuant to Section 2207 of the Public Resources Code. Accordingly, the property may be subject to inconveniences resulting from mining operations. You may wish to consider the impacts of these practices before you complete your transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 24.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.5.

(a) After a seller and his or her agent comply with Section 1103.2, they shall be relieved of further duty under this article with respect to those items of information. The seller and the seller’s agent shall not be required to provide notice to the prospective buyer if the information provided subsequently becomes inaccurate as a result of any governmental action, map revision, changed information, or other act
 or occurrence, unless the seller or agent has actual knowledge that the information has become inaccurate.

(b) If information disclosed in accordance with this article is subsequently rendered inaccurate as a result of any governmental action, map revision, changed information, or other act or occurrence subsequent to the delivery of the required disclosures, the inaccuracy resulting therefrom does not constitute a violation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 25.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.7.

Each disclosure required by this article and each act that may be performed in making the disclosure shall be made in good faith. For purposes of this article, “good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.8.

(a) The specification of items for disclosure in this article does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of law or that may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the sale transaction. The Legislature does not intend to affect the existing obligations of the parties to a real estate contract, or their agents, to disclose any fact materially
 affecting the value and desirability of the property, including, but not limited to, the physical condition of the property and previously received reports of physical inspection noted on the disclosure form provided pursuant to Section 1102.6 or 1102.6a.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to change the duty of a real estate broker or salesperson pursuant to Section 2079.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 26.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.9.

Any disclosure made pursuant to this article may be amended in writing by the seller or the seller’s agent, but the amendment shall be subject to Section 1103.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 27.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.10.

Delivery of disclosures required by this article shall be by personal delivery to the transferee or by mail to the prospective transferee. For the purposes of this article, delivery to the spouse of a transferee shall be deemed delivery to the transferee, unless provided otherwise by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.11.

Any person or entity, other than a real estate licensee licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, acting in the capacity of an escrow agent for the transfer of real property subject to this article shall not be deemed the agent of the transferor or transferee for purposes of the disclosure requirements of this article, unless the person or entity is empowered to so act by an express written agreement to that effect. The extent of that agency shall be governed by the written
 agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.12.

(a) If more than one licensed real estate broker is acting as an agent in a transaction subject to this article, the broker who has obtained the offer made by the transferee shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, deliver the disclosure required by this article to the transferee, unless the transferor has given other written instructions for delivery.

(b) If a licensed real estate broker responsible for delivering the disclosures under this section cannot
 obtain the disclosure document required and does not have written assurance from the transferee that the disclosure has been received, the broker shall advise the transferee in writing of his or her rights to the disclosure. A licensed real estate broker responsible for delivering disclosures under this section shall maintain a record of the action taken to effect compliance in accordance with Section 10148 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.13.

No transfer subject to this article shall be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provision of this article. However, any person who willfully or negligently violates or fails to perform any duty prescribed by any provision of this article shall be liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by a transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.15.

The provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 1102.1 shall apply to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 907, Sec. 29.   (AB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.8. Buyer’s Choice Act [1103.20. - 1103.22.]

1103.20.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Buyer’s Choice Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 957)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.21.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) Sales of foreclosed properties have become a dominant portion of homes on the resale real estate market.

(2) The recent troubled real estate market has resulted in a concentration of the majority of homes available for resale
 within the hands of foreclosing lenders and has dramatically changed the market dynamics affecting ordinary home buyers.

(3) Preserving the fair negotiability of contract terms is an important policy goal to be preserved in real estate transactions.

(4) The potential for unfairness occasioned by the resale of large numbers of foreclosed homes on the market requires that protections against abuses be made effective immediately.

(5) The federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (RESPA) creates general rules for fair negotiation of settlement services, prohibits kickbacks and specifically prohibits a seller in a federally related transaction from requiring a buyer to purchase title insurance from a particular insurer.

(6) California law does not
 specifically prohibit a seller from imposing, as a condition of sale of a foreclosed home, the purchase of title insurance or escrow services from a particular insurer or provider.

(7) Therefore it is necessary to add this act to California law to provide to a home buyer protection that follows the RESPA model and applies to, and prevents, the conditioning of a sale of a foreclosed home on the buyer’s purchase of title insurance from a particular insurer or title company and/or the buyer’s purchase of escrow services from a particular provider.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, for the purpose of this act, the sale of a residential real property is deemed to include the receipt of an offer to purchase that residential real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 957)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1103.22.

(a) A seller of residential real property improved by four or fewer dwelling units shall not require directly or indirectly, as a condition of selling the property, that title insurance covering the property or escrow service provided in connection with the sale of the property be purchased by the buyer from a particular title insurer or escrow agent. This section does not prohibit a buyer from
 agreeing to accept the services of a title insurer or an escrow agent recommended by the seller if written notice of the right to make an independent selection of those services is first provided by the seller to the buyer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Escrow service” means service provided by a person licensed pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code, or exempt from licensing pursuant to Section 17006 of the Financial Code.

(2) “Seller” means a mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust who acquired title to residential real property improved by four or fewer dwelling units at a foreclosure sale, including a trustee, agent, officer, or other employee of any such mortgagee or beneficiary.

(3) “Title
 insurance” means insurance offered by an insurer admitted in this state to transact title insurance pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12340) of Part 6 of the Insurance Code.

(c) A seller who violates this section shall be liable to a buyer in an amount equal to three times all charges made for the title insurance or escrow service. In addition, any person who violates this section shall be deemed to have violated his or her license law and shall be subject to discipline by his or her licensing entity.

(d) A transaction subject to this section shall not be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provision of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 957)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Transfer [1104. - 1134.]

1104.

A transfer of real property passes all easements attached thereto, and creates in favor thereof an easement to use other real property of the person whose estate is transferred in the same manner and to the same extent as such property was obviously and permanently used by the person whose estate is transferred, for the benefit thereof, at the time when the transfer was agreed upon or completed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1105.

A fee simple title is presumed to be intended to pass by a grant of real property, unless it appears from the grant that a lesser estate was intended.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

Where a person purports by proper instrument to grant real property in fee simple, and subsequently acquires any title, or claim of title thereto, the same passes by operation of law to the grantee, or his successors.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.

Every grant of an estate in real property is conclusive against the grantor, also against every one subsequently claiming under him, except a purchaser or incumbrancer who in good faith and for a valuable consideration acquires a title or lien by an instrument that is first duly recorded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1108.

A grant made by the owner of an estate for life or years, purporting to transfer a greater estate than he could lawfully transfer, does not work a forfeiture of his estate, but passes to the grantee all the estate which the grantor could lawfully transfer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1109.

Where a grant is made upon condition subsequent, and is subsequently defeated by the non-performance of the condition, the person otherwise entitled to hold under the grant must reconvey the property to the grantor or his successors, by grant, duly acknowledged for record.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1110.]

Section Eleven Hundred and Ten. An instrument purporting to be a grant of real property, to take effect upon condition precedent, passes the estate upon the performance of the condition.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

Grants of rents or of reversions or of remainders are good and effectual without attornments of the tenants; but no tenant who, before notice of the grant, shall have paid rent to the grantor, must suffer any damage thereby.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1112.]

Section Eleven Hundred and Twelve. A transfer of land, bounded by a highway, passes the title of the person whose estate is transferred to the soil of the highway in front to the center thereof, unless a different intent appears from the grant.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

From the use of the word “grant” in any conveyance by which an estate of inheritance or fee simple is to be passed, the following covenants, and none other, on the part of the grantor for himself and his heirs to the grantee, his heirs, and assigns, are implied, unless restrained by express terms contained in such conveyance:

1. That previous to the time of the execution of such conveyance, the grantor has not conveyed the same estate, or any right, title, or interest therein, to any person other than the grantee;

2. That such estate is at the time of the
 execution of such conveyance free from incumbrances done, made, or suffered by the grantor, or any person claiming under him.

Such covenants may be sued upon in the same manner as if they had been expressly inserted in the conveyance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1114.]

Section Eleven Hundred and Fourteen. The term “incumbrances” includes taxes, assessments, and all liens upon real property.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1115.

Lineal and collateral warrantees, with all their incidents, are abolished; but the heirs and devisees of every person who has made any covenant or agreement in reference to the title of, in, or to any real property, are answerable upon such covenant or agreement to the extent of the land descended or devised to them, in the cases and in the manner prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1133.

(a) If a lot, parcel, or unit of a subdivision is subject to a blanket encumbrance, as defined in Section 11013 of the Business and Professions Code, but is exempt from a requirement of compliance with Section 11013.2 of the Business and Professions Code, the subdivider, his or her agent, or representative, shall not sell, or lease for a term exceeding five years, the lot, parcel, or unit, nor cause
 it to be sold, or leased for a term exceeding five years, until the prospective purchaser or lessee of the lot, parcel, or unit has been furnished with and has signed a true copy of the following notice: 

BUYER/LESSEE IS AWARE OF THE FACT THAT THE LOT, PARCEL, OR UNIT WHICH HE OR SHE IS PROPOSING TO PURCHASE OR LEASE IS SUBJECT TO A DEED OF TRUST, MORTGAGE, OR OTHER LIEN KNOWN AS A “BLANKET ENCUMBRANCE.”

IF BUYER/LESSEE PURCHASES OR LEASES THIS LOT, PARCEL, OR UNIT, HE OR SHE COULD LOSE THAT INTEREST THROUGH FORECLOSURE OF THE BLANKET ENCUMBRANCE OR OTHER LEGAL PROCESS EVEN THOUGH BUYER/LESSEE IS NOT DELINQUENT IN HIS OR HER PAYMENTS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, OR LEASE. 
______ ________________
 DateSignature of
Buyer or Lessee 

(b) “Subdivision,” as used in subdivision (a), means improved or unimproved land that is divided or proposed to be divided for the purpose of sale, lease, or financing, whether immediate or future, into two or more lots, parcels, or units and includes a condominium project, as defined in Section 4125 or 6542, a community apartment project, as defined in Section 4105, a stock cooperative, as defined in Section 4190 or 6566, and a limited equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 4190.

(c) The failure of the buyer or lessee to sign the notice shall not invalidate any grant, conveyance, lease, or encumbrance.

(d) Any person or entity
 who willfully violates the provisions of this section shall be liable to the purchaser of a lot or unit which is subject to the provisions of this section for actual damages, and, in addition thereto, shall be guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). In an action to enforce the liability or fine, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 35) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 15.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1134.

(a) As soon as practicable before transfer of title for the first sale of a unit in a residential condominium, community apartment project, or stock cooperative which was converted from an existing dwelling to a condominium project, community apartment project, or stock cooperative, the owner or subdivider, or agent of the owner or subdivider, shall deliver to a prospective buyer a written statement listing all substantial defects or malfunctions in the major systems in the unit and common areas of the premises, or a written statement disclaiming knowledge of any such substantial defects or malfunctions. The disclaimer may be
 delivered only after the owner or subdivider has inspected the unit and the common areas and has not discovered a substantial defect or malfunction which a reasonable inspection would have disclosed.

(b) If any disclosure required to be made by this section is delivered after the execution of an agreement to purchase, the buyer shall have three days after delivery in person or five days after delivery by deposit in the mail, to terminate his or her agreement by delivery of written notice of that termination to the owner, subdivider, or agent. Any disclosure delivered after the execution of an agreement to purchase shall contain a statement describing the buyer’s right, method and time to rescind as prescribed by this subdivision.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Major systems” includes, but is not limited
 to, the roof, walls, floors, heating, air conditioning, plumbing, electrical systems or components of a similar or comparable nature, and recreational facilities.

(2) Delivery to a prospective buyer of the written statement required by this section shall be deemed effected when delivered personally or by mail to the prospective buyer or to an agent thereof, or to a spouse unless the agreement provides to the contrary. Delivery shall also be made to additional prospective buyers who have made a request therefor in writing.

(3) “Prospective buyer” includes any person who makes an offer to purchase a unit in the condominium, community apartment project, or stock cooperative.

(d) Any person who willfully fails to carry out the requirements of this section shall be liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by the
 buyer. 

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the injured party from pursuing any remedy available under any other provision of law.

(f) No transfer of title to a unit subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be invalid solely because of the failure of any person to comply with the requirements of this section.

(g) The written statement required by this section shall not abridge or limit any other obligation of disclosure created by any other provision of law or which is or may be required to avoid fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Transfer of Personal Property [1135. - 1148.]



  ARTICLE 1. Mode of Transfer [1135. - 1140.]

1135.

An interest in a ship can be transferred only by operation of law, or by written instrument, subscribed by the person making the transfer, or by his agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1931, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “customer” means any individual or entity who causes or caused a molder to fabricate, cast, or otherwise make a die, mold, or form.

(2) The term “molder” means any individual or entity, including, but not limited to, a tool or die maker, who fabricates, casts, or otherwise makes a die, mold, or form.

(3) For purposes of this section, the term “within three years following the last prior use”
 shall be construed to include any period following the last prior use of a die, mold, or form regardless of whether or not that period precedes the effective date of this section.

(b) In the absence of any agreement to the contrary, the customer shall have all rights and title to any die, mold, or form in the possession of the molder. 

(c) If a customer does not claim possession from a molder of a die, mold, or form within three years following the last prior use thereof, all rights and title to any die, mold, or form may be transferred by operation of law to the molder for the purpose of destroying or otherwise disposing of such die, mold, or form, consistent with this section.

(d) If a molder chooses to have all rights and title to any die, mold, or form transferred to the molder by operation of law, the molder
 shall send written notice by registered mail to the chief executive officer of the customer or, if the customer is not a business entity, to the customer himself or herself at the customer’s last known address indicating that the molder intends to terminate the customer’s rights and title by having all such rights and title transferred to the molder by operation of law pursuant to this section.

(e) If a customer does not respond in person or by mail to claim possession of the particular die, mold, or form within 120 days following the date the notice was sent, or does not make other contractual arrangements with the molder for storage thereof, all rights and title of the customer shall transfer by operation of law to the molder. Thereafter, the molder may destroy or otherwise dispose of the particular mold, tool, or die as the molder’s own property without any risk of liability to the customer, except that this section shall not be construed in
 any manner to affect any right of the customer, under federal patent or copyright law or any state or federal law pertaining to unfair competition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 290, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Gifts [1146. - 1148.]

1146.

A gift is a transfer of personal property, made voluntarily, and without consideration.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1147.

A verbal gift is not valid, unless the means of obtaining possession and control of the thing are given, nor, if it is capable of delivery, unless there is an actual or symbolical delivery of the thing to the donee.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1148.

A gift, other than a gift in view of impending death, cannot be revoked by the giver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Recording Transfers [1169. - 1220.]



  ARTICLE 2. Mode of Recording [1169. - 1173.]

1169.

Instruments entitled to be recorded must be recorded by the County Recorder of the county in which the real property affected thereby is situated.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1170.]

Section Eleven Hundred and Seventy. An instrument is deemed to be recorded when, being duly acknowledged or proved and certified, it is deposited in the Recorder’s office, with the proper officer, for record.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

Grants, absolute in terms, are to be recorded in one set of books, and mortgages in another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

The duties of county recorders, in respect to recording instruments, are prescribed by the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 593.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

The mode of recording transfers of ships registered under the laws of the United States is regulated by Acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proof and Acknowledgment of Instruments [1180. - 1207.]

1180.

The proof or acknowledgment of an instrument may be made at any place within this state before a justice, retired justice, or Clerk/Executive Officer of the Supreme Court, a justice, retired justice, or clerk of any court of appeal or judge or retired judge of a superior court, or the Secretary of the Senate or Chief Clerk of the Assembly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 36, Sec. 3.   (AB 452)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

The proof or acknowledgment of an instrument may be made before a notary public at any place within this state, or within the county or city and county in this state in which the officer specified below was elected or appointed, before either:

(a) A clerk of a superior court.

(b) A county clerk.

(c) A court commissioner.

(d) A retired judge of a municipal or justice court.

(e) A district attorney.

(f) A clerk of a board of supervisors.

(g) A city clerk.

(h) A county counsel.

(i) A city attorney.

(j) Secretary of the Senate.

(k) Chief Clerk of the Assembly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.1.

(a) Section 1181 shall not be construed to authorize any person, other than a notary public authorized by the Secretary of State to perform online notarizations pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8231) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to take a proof or acknowledgment of an instrument by means of appearances using audio-video communication, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8231.1 of the Government Code.

(b) A California notary public shall not provide online notarization for any 
 principal, and an online notarization platform shall not be authorized for use by a California notary public, until the earlier of the following:

 (1) Certification by the Secretary of State on its internet website that the Secretary of State’s technology project necessary to implement statutes related to online notarization is complete.

(2) January 1, 2030, unless the Secretary of State informs the Legislature and the Governor in writing on or before January 1, 2029, that the technology project necessary to implement statutes related to online
 notarization will not be completed by January 1, 2030, including a detailed status of the technology project.

(c) This section shall remain in effect until the attainment of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.1.

(a) Section 1181 shall not be construed to authorize any person, other than a notary public authorized by the Secretary of State to perform online notarizations pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8231) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to take a proof or acknowledgment of an instrument by means of appearances using audio-video communication, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8231.1 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative
 upon the earlier of the following:

 (1) Certification by the Secretary of State on its internet website that the Secretary of State’s technology project necessary to implement statutes related to online notarization is complete.

(2) January 1, 2030, unless the Secretary of State informs the Legislature and the Governor in writing on or before January 1, 2029, that the technology project necessary to implement statutes related to online notarization will not be completed by January 1, 2030, including a detailed status of the technology project.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

The proof or acknowledgment of an instrument may be taken without this state, but within the United States, and within the jurisdiction of the officer, by any of the following:

(a) A justice, judge, or clerk of any court of record of the United States.

(b) A justice, judge, or clerk of any court of record of any state.

(c) A commissioner appointed by the Governor or Secretary of State for that purpose.

(d) A notary public.

(e) Any other officer of the state where the acknowledgment is made authorized by its laws to take such proof or acknowledgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 291, Sec. 3.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.

(a) The proof or acknowledgment of an instrument may be taken without the United States, by any of the following:

(1) A minister, commissioner, or chargè d’affaires of the United States, resident and accredited in the country where the proof or acknowledgment is made.

(2) A consul, vice consul, or consular agent of the United States, resident in the country where the proof or acknowledgment is made.

(3) A judge of a court of record of the country where the proof or acknowledgment is made.

(4) Commissioners appointed by the Governor or Secretary of State for that purpose.

(5) A notary public.

(b) If the proof or acknowledgment is taken by a notary public, the signature of the notary public shall be proved or acknowledged (1) before a judge of a court of record of the country where the proof or acknowledgment is taken, or (2) by any American diplomatic officer, consul general, consul, vice consul, or consular agent, or (3) by an apostille (certification) affixed to the instrument pursuant to the terms of The Hague Convention Abolishing the Requirement of Legalization for Foreign Public Documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 291, Sec. 4.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.5.

Any officer on active duty or performing inactive-duty training in the armed forces having the general powers of a notary public pursuant to Section 936 or 1044a of Title 10 of the United States Code (Public Law 90-632 and 101-510) and any successor statutes may perform all notarial acts for any person serving in the armed forces of the United States, wherever he or she may be, or for any spouse of a person serving in the armed forces, wherever he or she may be, or for any person eligible for legal assistance under laws and regulations of the United
 States, wherever he or she may be, for any person serving with, employed by, or accompanying such armed forces outside the United States and outside the Canal Zone, Puerto Rico, Guam and the Virgin Islands, and any person subject to the Uniform Code of Military Justice outside of the United States.

Any instrument acknowledged by any such officer or any oath or affirmation made before such officer shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state therein the place of execution or acknowledgment. No seal or authentication of the officer’s certificate of acknowledgment or of any jurat signed by him or her shall be required but the officer taking the acknowledgment shall endorse thereon or attach thereto a certificate substantially in a form authorized by the laws of this state or in the following form:

On this the ___ day of ____, 19_, before me _____, the undersigned officer, personally appeared _____ known to me (or
 satisfactorily proven) to be (a) serving in the armed forces of the United States, (b) a spouse of a person serving in the armed forces of the United States, or (c) a person serving with, employed by, or accompanying the armed forces of the United States outside the United States and outside the Canal Zone, Puerto Rico, Guam, and the Virgin Islands, and to be the person whose name is subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged that he or she executed the same. And the undersigned does further certify that he or she is at the date of this certificate a commissioned officer of the armed forces of the United States having the general powers of a notary public under the provisions of Section 936 or 1044a of Title 10 of the United States Code (Public Law 90-632 and 101-510).Signature of officer, rank, branch of service and capacity in which signed.To any affidavit subscribed and sworn to before such officer there shall be attached a jurat substantially in the following form:Subscribed and sworn to before me on this ____ day of _______, 19__.Signature of officer, rank, branch of service and capacity in which signed.The recitals contained in any such
 certificate or jurat shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof, and any certificate of acknowledgment, oath or affirmation purporting to have been made by any commissioned officer of the Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps or Coast Guard shall, notwithstanding the omission of any specific recitals therein, constitute presumptive evidence of the existence of the facts necessary to authorize such acknowledgment, oath or affirmation to be taken by the certifying officer pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1184.

When any of the officers mentioned in Sections 1180, 1181, 1182, and 1183 are authorized by a law to appoint a deputy, the acknowledgment or proof may be taken by such deputy, in the name of his principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

1185.

(a) The acknowledgment of an instrument shall not be taken unless the officer taking it has satisfactory evidence that the person making the acknowledgment is the individual who is described in and who executed the instrument.

(b) For purposes of this section, “satisfactory evidence” means the absence of information, evidence, or other
 circumstances that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the person making the acknowledgment is not the individual he or she claims to be and any one of the following:

(1) (A) The oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally known to the officer, whose identity is proven to the officer upon presentation of a document satisfying the requirements of paragraph (3) or (4), that the person making the acknowledgment is personally known to the witness and that each of the following are true:

(i) The person making the acknowledgment is the person named in the document.

(ii) The person making the acknowledgment is personally known to the witness.

(iii) That it is the reasonable belief of the witness that the circumstances
 of the person making the acknowledgment are such that it would be very difficult or impossible for that person to obtain another form of identification.

(iv) The person making the acknowledgment does not possess any of the identification documents named in paragraphs (3) and (4).

(v) The witness does not have a financial interest in the document being acknowledged and is not named in the document.
